Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-9109
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Act.

Laws 2016, LB772, § 9.
January 1, 2017